California statutes. Vehicle Code
(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 709, Sec. 1) by Stats. 2022, Ch. 28, Sec. 155.   (SB 1380)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.    See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 156 of Stats. 2022, Ch. 28.)
-------------------------------------------

40240.

(a) The City and County of San Francisco may install automated forward facing parking control devices on city-owned or district-owned public transit vehicles, as defined in Section 99211 of the Public Utilities Code, for the purpose of video imaging of parking violations occurring in transit-only traffic lanes and at transit stops. Citations shall be issued only for violations captured during the posted hours of operation for a transit-only traffic lane or during the scheduled operating hours at transit stops. The devices shall be angled and focused so as to capture video images of parking violations and not unnecessarily capture identifying images of other drivers, vehicles, and pedestrians. The devices shall record the date and time of
 the violation at the same time as the video images are captured. Transit agencies may share the relevant data, video, and images of parking violations collected by automated forward facing parking control devices with the local parking enforcement entity and local agency in the jurisdiction where the violation occurred. The City and County of San Francisco may only install forward facing cameras pursuant to this section if the examiner or issuing agency, as described in Section 40215, includes options to reduce or waive the payment of a parking penalty if the examiner or issuing agency determines that the person is an indigent person as defined in Section 40220.

(b) Prior to issuing notices of parking violations pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 40241, the City and County of San Francisco shall commence a program to issue only warning notices for
 60 days and shall also make a public announcement of the program and provide the public with information about the enforcement program, existing parking regulations, and the
 payment options available for low-income persons at least 60 days prior to commencement of issuing notices of parking violations.

(c) A designated employee of the City and County of San Francisco who is qualified to issue parking citations shall review video image recordings for the purpose of determining whether a parking violation occurred in a transit-only traffic lane or at a transit stop. A violation of a statute, regulation, or ordinance governing vehicle parking under this code, under a federal or state statute or regulation, or under an ordinance enacted by the City and County of San Francisco occurring in a transit-only traffic lane or at a transit stop observed by the designated employee in the recordings is subject to a civil penalty.

(d) The registered
 owner shall be permitted to review the video image evidence of the alleged violation during normal business hours at no cost.

(e) (1) Except as it may be included in court records described in Section 68152 of the Government Code, or as provided in paragraph (2), the video image evidence may be retained for up to six months from the date the information was first obtained, or 60 days after final disposition of the citation, whichever date is later, after which time the information shall be destroyed.

(2) Notwithstanding Section 26202.6 of the Government Code, video image evidence from forward facing automated enforcement devices that does not contain evidence of a parking violation occurring in a transit-only traffic lane or at a transit stop shall be destroyed
 within 15 days after the information was first obtained. Video image data and records collected pursuant to this section shall not be used or processed by an automated license plate recognition system, as defined in Section 1798.90.5 of the Civil Code, unless the public transit operator, city, county, city and county, or local enforcement authority meets the requirements of this paragraph and paragraph (1), the requirements of subdivision (f), and the requirements of subdivision (e) of Section 40241.

(f) Notwithstanding Article 1 (commencing with Section 7922.500) and Article 2 (commencing with Section 7922.525) of Chapter 1 of Part 3 of Division 10 of Title 1 of the Government Code or any other law, the video image records are confidential. Public
 agencies shall use and allow access to these records only for the purposes authorized by this article.

(g) For purposes of this article, “transit-only traffic lane” means any designated transit-only lane on which use is restricted to mass transit vehicles or other designated vehicles, including taxis and vanpools, during posted times.

(h) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2027.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 709, Sec. 2) by Stats. 2022, Ch. 28, Sec. 156.   (SB 1380)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

40240.5.

(a) A public transit operator, including the Alameda-Contra Costa Transit District, that implements an automated enforcement system to enforce parking violations occurring in transit-only traffic lanes and at transit stops pursuant to this article, shall provide to the transportation, privacy, and judiciary committees of the Legislature an evaluation report of the enforcement system’s effectiveness, impact on privacy, impact on traffic outcomes, cost to implement, change in citations issued, and generation of revenue, no later than
 January 1, 2025. This section shall not apply to the City and County of San Francisco.

(b) A report submitted pursuant to this section shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 709, Sec. 4.   (AB 917)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

40241.

(a) A designated employee of the local agency, including a contracted law enforcement agency, shall issue a notice of parking violation to the registered owner of a vehicle within 15 calendar days of the date of the violation. A designated employee or contracted law enforcement agency may decline to issue a ticket based on the evidence in the video illustrating hardship. The notice of parking violation shall set forth the violation of a statute, regulation, or ordinance governing vehicle parking under this code, under a federal or state statute or regulation, or under an ordinance enacted by the local agency occurring in a transit-only traffic lane or at a transit stop, a statement indicating that payment is required within 21 calendar days from
 the date of citation issuance, and the procedure for the registered owner, lessee, or rentee to deposit the parking penalty or contest the citation pursuant to Section 40215. The notice of parking violation shall also set forth the date, time, and location of the violation, the vehicle license number, registration expiration date, if visible, the color of the vehicle, and, if possible, the make of the vehicle. The notice of parking violation, or copy of the notice, shall be considered a record kept in the ordinary course of business of the local agency and shall be prima facie evidence of the facts contained in the notice. The local agency shall send information regarding the process for requesting review of the video image evidence along with the notice of parking violation.

(b) The notice of parking violation shall be served by
 depositing the notice in the United States mail to the registered owner’s last known address listed with the Department of Motor Vehicles. Proof of mailing demonstrating that the notice of parking violation was mailed to that address shall be maintained by the local agency. If the registered owner, by appearance or by mail, makes payment to the processing agency or contests the violation within either 21 calendar days from the date of mailing of the citation, or 14 calendar days after the mailing of the notice of delinquent parking violation, the parking penalty shall consist solely of the amount of the original penalty.

(c) If, within 21 days after the notice of parking violation is issued, the local agency determines that, in the interest of justice, the notice of parking violation should be canceled, the local agency shall cancel the
 notice of parking violation pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 40215. The reason for the cancellation shall be set forth in writing.

(d) Following an initial review by the local agency, and an administrative hearing, pursuant to Section 40215, a contestant may seek court review by filing an appeal pursuant to Section 40230.

(e) A local agency or a contracted law enforcement agency,
 may contract with a private vendor for the processing of notices of parking violations and notices of delinquent violations. The local agency shall maintain overall control and supervision of the program.

(f) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 709, Sec. 5.   (AB 917)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version as added by Sec. 6 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 709.)
-------------------------------------------

40241.

(a) A designated employee of the City and County of San Francisco, including a contracted law enforcement agency, shall issue a notice of parking violation to the registered owner of a vehicle within 15 calendar days of the date of the violation. A designated employee or contracted law enforcement agency may decline to issue a ticket based on the evidence in the video illustrating hardship. The notice of parking violation shall set forth the violation of a statute, regulation, or ordinance governing vehicle parking under this code, under a federal or state statute or regulation, or under an ordinance enacted by the City and County of San Francisco occurring in a transit-only traffic lane or at a transit stop, a
 statement indicating that payment is required within 21 calendar days from the date of citation issuance, and the procedure for the registered owner, lessee, or rentee to deposit the parking penalty or contest the citation pursuant to Section 40215. The notice of parking violation shall also set forth the date, time, and location of the violation, the vehicle license number, registration expiration date, if visible, the color of the vehicle, and, if possible, the make of the vehicle. The notice of parking violation, or copy of the notice, shall be considered a record kept in the ordinary course of business of the City and County of San Francisco and shall be prima facie evidence of the facts contained in the notice. The City and County of San Francisco shall send information regarding the process for requesting review of the video image evidence along with the notice of parking violation.

(b) The notice of parking violation shall be served by depositing the notice in the United States mail to the registered owner’s last known address listed with the Department of Motor Vehicles. Proof of mailing demonstrating that the notice of parking violation was mailed to that address shall be maintained by the City and County of San Francisco. If the registered owner, by appearance or by mail, makes payment to the processing agency or contests the violation within either 21 calendar days from the date of mailing of the citation, or 14 calendar days after the mailing of the notice of delinquent parking violation, the parking penalty shall consist solely of the amount of the original penalty.

(c) If, within 21 days after the notice of parking violation is issued, the City and
 County of San Francisco determines that, in the interest of justice, the notice of parking violation should be canceled, the City and County of San Francisco shall cancel the notice of parking violation pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 40215. The reason for the cancellation shall be set forth in writing.

(d) Following an initial review by the City and County of San Francisco and an administrative hearing pursuant to Section 40215, a contestant may seek court review by filing an appeal pursuant to Section 40230.

(e) The City and County of San Francisco or a contracted law enforcement agency may contract with a private vendor for the processing of notices of parking violations and notices of delinquent violations. The City and County of San Francisco shall maintain overall
 control and supervision of the program.

(f) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2027.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 5) and added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 709, Sec. 6.   (AB 917)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.6. Procedure on Photographic Imaging of Parking Violations Occurring in Bicycle Lanes [40245. - 40248.]

40245.

(a) A local agency may install automated forward facing parking control devices on city-owned or district-owned parking enforcement vehicles for the purpose of taking photographs of parking violations occurring in bicycle lanes, as described in Section 21207. The devices shall be angled and focused so as to only capture photographs of parking violations and not capture identifying images of other drivers, vehicles, and pedestrians. The devices shall record the date and time of the violation at the same time as the photographs are captured. A local agency may only install forward facing cameras pursuant to this section if the examiner or issuing agency, as described in Section 40215, includes options to reduce or waive the payment of a parking
 penalty if the examiner or issuing agency determines that the person is an indigent person as defined in Section 40220.

(b) Prior to issuing notices of parking violations pursuant to Section 21211, a local agency shall commence a program to issue only warning notices for 60 days and shall also make a public announcement of the program and provide the public with information about the enforcement program, existing parking regulations, and the payment options available for low-income persons at least 60 days prior to commencement of issuing notices of parking violations.

(c) A designated employee of a city, county, city and county, or a contracted law enforcement agency for a special transit district, who is qualified by a city, county, city and county, or district to issue
 parking citations, shall review
 photographs for the purpose of determining whether a parking violation occurred in a bicycle lane. A violation of a statute, regulation, or ordinance governing vehicle parking under this code, under a federal or state statute or regulation, or under an ordinance enacted by a city, county, city and county, or special transit district occurring in a bicycle lane observed by the designated employee in the recordings is subject to a civil penalty.

(d) The registered owner shall be permitted to review the photographic evidence of the alleged violation during normal business hours at no cost.

(e) (1) Except as it may be included in court records described in Section 68152 of the Government Code, or as provided in paragraph (2), the photographic
 evidence may be retained for up to 30 days after final disposition of the citation. The photographic evidence shall not be retained for more than six months from the date the information was first obtained, after which time the information shall be destroyed.

(2) Notwithstanding Section 26202.6 of the Government Code, photographic evidence from forward facing automated enforcement devices that does not contain evidence of a parking violation occurring in a bicycle lane shall be destroyed within 15 days after the information was first obtained. Photographic data and records collected pursuant to this section shall not be used or processed by an automated license plate recognition system, as defined in Section 1798.90.5 of the Civil Code, unless the local agency meets the requirements of this subdivision, the requirements of subdivision (f),
 and the requirements of subdivision (e) of Section 40247.

(f) Notwithstanding Article 1 (commencing with Section 7922.500) and Article 2 (commencing with Section 7922.525) of Chapter 1 of Part 3 of Division 10 of Title 1 of the Government Code, or any other law, the photographic records are confidential. Public agencies shall use and allow access to these records only for the purposes authorized by this article.

(g) For purposes of this article, “local agency” means a public transit operator as defined in Section 99210 of the Public Utilities Code or a local city, county, or city and county parking enforcement authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 432, Sec. 1.   (AB 361)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 40248.)
-------------------------------------------

40246.

(a) A local agency that implements an automated enforcement system to enforce parking violations occurring in bicycle lanes pursuant to this article shall provide to the transportation, privacy, and judiciary committees of the Legislature an evaluation report of the enforcement system’s effectiveness, impact on privacy, impact on traffic outcomes, cost to implement, change in citations issued, and generation of revenue, no later than December 31, 2028.

(b) A report submitted pursuant to this
 section shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 432, Sec. 1.   (AB 361)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 40248.)
-------------------------------------------

40247.

(a) A designated employee of a local agency, including a contracted law enforcement agency, shall issue a notice of parking violation to the registered owner of a vehicle within 15 calendar days of the date of the violation. A designated employee or contracted law enforcement agency may decline to issue a ticket based on the evidence in the photograph illustrating hardship. The notice of parking violation shall set forth the violation of a statute, regulation, or ordinance governing vehicle parking under this code, under a federal or state statute or regulation, or under an ordinance enacted by the local agency in a bicycle lane, a statement indicating that payment is required within 21 calendar days from the date of citation
 issuance, and the procedure for the registered owner, lessee, or rentee to deposit the parking penalty or contest the citation pursuant to Section 40215. The notice of parking violation shall also set forth the date, time, and location of the violation, the vehicle license number, the registration expiration date, if visible, the color of the vehicle, and a copy of the photographic evidence. The notice of parking violation, or copy of the notice, shall be considered a record kept in the ordinary course of business of the local agency and shall be prima facie evidence of the facts contained in
 the notice. The local agency shall send information regarding the process for requesting review of the
 photographic evidence along with the notice of parking violation.

(b) The notice of parking violation shall be served by depositing the notice in the United States mail to the registered owner’s last known address listed with the Department of Motor Vehicles. Proof of mailing demonstrating that the notice of parking violation was mailed to that address shall be maintained by the local agency. If the registered owner, by appearance or by mail, makes payment to the processing agency or contests the violation within either 21 calendar days from the date of mailing of the citation, or 14 calendar days after the mailing of the notice of delinquent parking violation, the parking penalty shall consist solely of the amount of the original penalty.

(c) If, within 21
 days after the notice of parking violation is issued, the local agency determines that, in the interest of justice, the notice of parking violation should be canceled, the local agency shall cancel the notice of parking violation pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 40215. The reason for the cancellation shall be set forth in writing.

(d) Following an initial review by the local agency and an administrative hearing pursuant to Section 40215, a contestant may seek court review by filing an appeal pursuant to Section 40230.

(e) A local agency or a contracted law enforcement agency may contract with a private vendor for the processing of notices of parking violations and notices of delinquent violations. The local agency shall maintain overall control and supervision of the program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 432, Sec. 1.   (AB 361)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 40248.)
-------------------------------------------

40248.

This article shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 432, Sec. 1.   (AB 361)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.   Repeal affects Article 3.6, commencing with Section 40245.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Procedure on Toll Evasion Violations [40250. - 40273.]

40250.

(a) Except where otherwise specifically provided, a violation of a statute, regulation, or ordinance governing the evasion of tolls on toll facilities under this code, under a federal or state statute or regulation, or under an ordinance enacted by a local authority including a joint powers authority, or a district organized pursuant to Part 3 (commencing with Section 27000) of Division 16 of the Streets and Highways Code is subject to a civil penalty. The enforcement of a civil penalty is governed by the civil administrative procedures set forth in this article.

(b) Except as provided in Section 40264, the registered owner, driver, rentee, or lessee of a vehicle cited for a toll evasion violation of a toll facility, under an applicable statute, regulation, or ordinance shall be jointly and severally liable for the toll evasion penalty imposed under this article, unless the owner can show that the vehicle was used without the express or implied consent of that person. A person who pays a toll evasion penalty, a civil judgment, costs, or administrative fees pursuant to this article has the right to recover the same from the driver, rentee, or lessee.

(c) The driver of a vehicle who is not the vehicle owner but who uses or operates the vehicle with the express or implied permission of the owner is the agent of the owner to receive a notice of a toll evasion violation served in accordance with this article and may contest the notice of violation.

(d) If the driver of the vehicle is in violation of a statute, regulation, or ordinance governing toll evasion violations, and if the driver is arrested pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 40300) of Chapter 2, this article does not apply.

(e) For the purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Issuing agency” is an entity, public or private, authorized to collect tolls.

(2) “Registered owner” is either of the following:

(A) A person described in Section 505.

(B) A person registered as the owner of the vehicle by the appropriate agency or authority of another state, the District of Columbia, or a territory or possession of the United States.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 150, Sec. 1.   Effective July 27, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

40251.

All toll evasion penalties collected by the processing agency, as defined in Section 40253, including all administrative fees, process service fees, and fees and collection costs related to civil debt collection, shall be deposited to the account of the issuing agency, except that those sums attributable to the issuance of a toll evasion violation by a member of the California Highway Patrol shall be deposited in accordance with Article 1 (commencing with Section 42200) of Chapter 2 of Division 18 in the city or county where the violation occurred. At the end of each fiscal year, the issuing agencies of facilities which have been developed pursuant to Section 143 of the Streets and Highways Code shall deposit in the State Highway Account in the State Transportation Fund any amounts collected under Section 40253 in excess of the sum of the unpaid toll, administrative fees, other costs incurred by the issuing agency that are related to toll evasion, process service fees, and fees and collection costs related to civil debt collection.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 739, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

40252.

(a) An issuing agency may elect to contract with the state, the county, a local authority, or a district organized pursuant to Part 3 (commencing with Section 27000) of Division 16 of the Streets and Highways Code, or with a private vendor, for the processing of notices of toll evasion violations and notices of delinquent toll evasion violations, prior to filing with the court pursuant to Section 40256.

(b) As used in this article, “toll evasion penalty” includes, but is not limited to, any late payment penalty, administrative fee, fine, assessment, and costs of collection as provided by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 739, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

40253.

If a contract is entered into pursuant to Section 40252, for the purpose of this article, “processing agency” means the party responsible for the processing of the notices of toll evasions and notices of delinquent toll evasions. Absent such contract, “processing agency” shall be synonymous with “issuing agency.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 739, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

40254.

(a) If a vehicle is found, by automated devices, visual observation, or otherwise, to have evaded tolls on a toll road or toll bridge, and subdivision (d) of Section 40250 does not apply, an issuing agency or a processing agency, as the case may be, shall, within 21 days of the violation, forward to the registered owner a notice of toll evasion violation setting forth the violation, including reference to the section violated, the approximate time thereof, and the location where the violation occurred. If accurate information concerning the identity and address of the registered owner is not available to the processing agency within 21 days of the violation, the processing agency shall have an additional 45 calendar days to obtain such information and forward the notice of toll evasion violation. If the registered owner is a
 repeat violator, the processing agency shall forward the notice of toll evasion violation within 90 calendar days of the violation. “Repeat violator” means any registered owner for whom more than five violations have been issued pursuant to this section in any calendar month within the preceding 12-month period. The notice of toll evasion violation shall also set forth, if applicable, all of the following:

(1) The vehicle license plate number.

(2) If practicable, the registration expiration date and the make of the vehicle.

(3) If a vehicle is found, by automated devices, to have evaded the toll through failure to meet occupancy requirements in a high-occupancy toll lane, a copy of photographic evidence on which the determination was based.

(4) A clear
 and concise explanation of the procedures for contesting the violation and appealing an adverse decision pursuant to Sections 40255 and 40256.

(b) After the authorized person has notified the processing agency of a toll evasion violation, the processing agency shall prepare and forward the notice of violation to the registered owner of the vehicle cited for the violation. Any person, including the authorized person and any member of the person’s department or agency, or any peace officer who, with intent to prejudice, damage, or defraud, is found guilty of altering, concealing, modifying, nullifying, or destroying, or causing to be altered, concealed, modified, nullified, or destroyed, the face of the original or any copy of a notice that was retained by the authorized person before it is filed with the processing agency or with a person authorized to receive the deposit of the toll evasion violation is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(c) If, after a copy of the notice of toll evasion violation has been sent to the registered owner, the issuing person determines that, due to a failure of proof of apparent violation, the notice of toll evasion violation should be dismissed, the issuing agency may recommend, in writing, that the charges be dismissed. The recommendation shall cite the reasons for the recommendation and shall be filed with the processing agency.

(d) If the processing agency makes a finding that there are grounds for dismissal, the notice of toll evasion violation shall be canceled pursuant to Section 40255.

(e) A personal relationship with any law enforcement officer, public official, law enforcement agency, processing agency, or toll operating agency or entity shall not be grounds for dismissal of the violation.

(f) The processing agency shall use its best efforts to obtain accurate information concerning the identity and address of the registered owner for the purpose of forwarding a notice of toll evasion violation pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 278.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

40255.

(a) Within 21 days from the issuance of the notice of toll evasion violation, or within 30 days from the mailing of the notice of delinquent toll evasion, whichever occurs later, a person may contest a notice of toll evasion violation or a notice of delinquent toll evasion, without having to deposit the outstanding toll or toll evasion penalty. In that case, the processing agency shall do the following:

(1) The processing agency shall either investigate with its own records and staff or request that the issuing agency investigate the circumstances of the notice with respect to the contestant’s written explanation of reasons for contesting the toll evasion violation. At a minimum, the processing agency or issuing agency shall review the evidence
 on which the alleged violation was based, including any photographs of the alleged violation, the department’s registered owner information, and confirmation that a full and complete payment was not made. If, based upon the results of that investigation, the processing agency is satisfied that the violation did not occur or that the registered owner was not responsible for the violation, the processing agency shall cancel the notice of toll evasion violation and make an adequate record of the reasons for canceling the notice. The processing agency shall mail the results of the investigation to the person who contested the notice of toll evasion violation or the notice of delinquent toll evasion violation, or may email the results if the person contesting the notice requests email notification in lieu of mail and provides an email address.

(2) If the person contesting a notice of toll evasion violation or notice of delinquent toll evasion
 violation is not satisfied with the results of the investigation provided for in paragraph (1), the person may, within 15 days of the mailing or emailing of the results of the investigation, deposit the amount of the toll evasion penalty and request an administrative review. If the person meets the income criteria in subdivision (a) of Section 40269.5, as verified by the issuing or processing agency or their designee, the person shall only be required to deposit the amount of the toll, and not the amount of the toll evasion penalty. After January 1, 1996, an administrative hearing shall be held within 90 calendar days following the receipt of a request for an administrative hearing, excluding any time tolled pursuant to this article. The person requesting the hearing may request one continuance, not to exceed 21 calendar days.

(b) The administrative review procedure shall consist of the following:

(1) The person requesting an administrative review shall indicate to the processing agency their election for a review by mail or personal conference.

(2) If the person requesting an administrative review is a minor, that person shall be permitted to appear at an administrative review or admit responsibility for a toll evasion violation without the necessity of the appointment of a guardian. The processing agency may proceed against that person in the same manner as if that person were an adult.

(3) (A) The administrative review shall be conducted before a reviewer designated to conduct the review by the issuing agency’s governing body or chief executive officer. In the case of violations on facilities developed pursuant to Section 143 of the Streets and Highways Code, the processing agency shall
 contract with a public agency or a private entity that has no financial interest in the facility for the provision of administrative review services pursuant to this subdivision. The costs of those administrative review services shall be included in the administrative fees authorized by this article.

(B) In addition to any other requirements of employment, a reviewer shall demonstrate those qualifications, training, and objectivity prescribed by the issuing agency’s governing body or chief executive as are necessary and which are consistent with the duties and responsibilities set forth in this article.

(C) The examiner’s continued employment, performance evaluation, compensation, and benefits shall not be directly or indirectly linked to the amount of fines collected by the examiner.

(4) The officer or person
 authorized to issue a notice of toll evasion violation shall not be required to participate in an administrative review. The issuing agency shall not be required to produce any evidence other than the notice of toll evasion violation or copy thereof, information received from the department identifying the registered owner of the vehicle, and a statement under penalty of perjury from the person reporting the violation. The documentation in proper form shall be considered prima facie evidence of the violation.

(5) For a toll evasion violation that occurs on a vehicular crossing or toll highway where the issuing agency allows pay-by-plate toll payment, as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 23302, the officer or person authorized to issue a notice of toll evasion violation shall not be required to participate in an administrative review. The issuing agency shall not be required to produce any evidence other than the notice of toll evasion
 violation or copy thereof, information received from the department identifying the registered owner of the vehicle, and a statement from the officer or person authorized to issue a notice of toll evasion that the tolls or other charges and any applicable fee was not paid in accordance with the issuing agency’s policies for pay-by-plate toll payment. Any officer or person who knowingly provides false information pursuant to this paragraph shall be subject to a civil penalty for each violation in the minimum amount of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) up to a maximum amount of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500). An action for a civil penalty may be brought by any public prosecutor in the name of the people of the State of California. The documentation in proper form shall be considered prima facie evidence of the violation.

(6) The review shall be conducted in accordance with the written procedure established by the processing agency
 which shall ensure fair and impartial review of contested toll evasion violations. The agency’s final decision may be delivered personally or by first-class mail.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2024.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 10) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 969, Sec. 11.   (AB 2594)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative July 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

40256.

(a) Within 20 days after the mailing of the final decision described in subdivision (b) of Section 40255, the contestant may seek review by filing an appeal to the superior court, where the same shall be heard de novo, except that the contents of the processing agency’s file in the case on appeal shall be received in evidence. A copy of the notice of toll evasion violation shall be admitted into evidence as prima facie evidence of the facts stated therein. A copy of the notice of appeal shall be served in person or by first-class mail upon the processing agency by the contestant. For purposes of computing the 20-day period, Section 1013 of the Code of Civil Procedure shall be applicable. A proceeding under this subdivision is a limited civil case.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 72055 of the Government Code, the fee for filing the notice of appeal shall be twenty-five dollars ($25). If the appellant prevails, this fee, together with any deposit of toll evasion penalty, shall be promptly refunded by the processing agency in accordance with the judgment of the court.

(c) The conduct of the hearing on appeal under this section is a subordinate judicial duty which may be performed by commissioners and other subordinate judicial officials at the direction of the presiding judge of the court.

(d) If no notice of appeal of the processing agency’s decision is filed within the period set forth in subdivision (a), the decision shall be deemed final.

(e) If the toll evasion penalty has not been deposited and the decision is adverse to the contestant, the processing agency may, promptly after the decision becomes final, proceed to collect the penalty under Section 40267.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 784, Sec. 602.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

40257.

The notice of toll evasion violation shall be accompanied by a written notice of the toll evasion penalty due for that violation and the address of the person authorized to receive a deposit of the toll evasion penalty, to whom payments may be sent, and a statement in bold print that payments of the toll evasion penalty for the toll evasion violation may be sent through the mail.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 739, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

40258.

(a) (1) The schedule of toll evasion penalties for a toll evasion violation on a toll bridge shall not exceed twenty-five dollars ($25) for the notice of toll evasion violation, and shall not exceed fifty dollars ($50) for the notice of delinquent toll evasion violation for a cumulative total of fifty dollars ($50) for each individual toll evasion violation.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the schedule of toll evasion penalties may include any administrative fee, fine, or assessment imposed by the state after enactment of this chapter in addition to the cumulative fifty-dollar ($50) limit per each individual toll evasion violation.

(b) If the registered
 owner, by appearance or by mail, makes payment to the processing agency within 15 days of the mailing of the notice of toll evasion violation issued pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 40254 for a bridge toll evasion, the amount owed shall consist of the amount of the toll without any additional penalties, administrative fees, or charges.
